Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 6
CANCELLATION OF REGISTRATION

Editor's note:

This part 6 was added with relocations in 1997 containing relocated provisions of some sections formerly located in parts 2 and 3 of this article. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

1-2-601. Withdrawal of registration.

At any time that registration is permitted in the county clerk and recorder's office, any person who desires to withdraw or cancel his or her own registration may do so by filing with the county clerk and recorder a self-affirmation of withdrawal of registration, and the self-affirmation shall be used as the record of evidence to cancel the elector's registration record.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 465, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-214 as it existed prior to 1997.

1-2-602. Deceased electors.

As soon as is practicable after the end of each month, the state registrar of vital statistics shall furnish the secretary of state with a report of all persons eighteen years of age or older who have died during the previous month. To the extent possible, persons on the report shall be identified by name, county of residence, date of birth, and social security number.

The secretary of state shall forward to each county clerk and recorder monthly the information received from the state registrar of vital statistics concerning persons registered to vote in the county who have died.

The county clerk and recorder shall cancel the registration of any elector who is deceased and of whose death the county clerk and recorder has received notice pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(3.5) The secretary of state may by electronic means cancel the registration of any elector who is deceased and of whose death the secretary has received notice pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

The county clerk and recorder shall cancel the registration of any elector who is deceased when the county clerk and recorder receives written notice of the fact. The written notice shall be signed by a family member of the deceased. If the county clerk and recorder has sufficient proof that an elector is deceased, cancellation may be made without such written notice.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 465, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3.5) added, p. 2077, § 13, effective May 22.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-2-302 (4) and (7) and 1-2-226 (1) and (2) as they existed prior to 1997.

1-2-603. Notification that elector has moved and registered in different county.

If the elector registers to vote in another county, the county clerk and recorder of the elector's new county of residence shall transfer the elector's registration record from the old county in accordance with the following requirements:

If the elector provides a name, date of birth, and prior address and the county clerk and recorder can match the name, date of birth, and prior address to the elector's prior registration record, the elector's registration record shall be transferred from the old county.

If the elector provides a name and date of birth but does not provide a prior address, the elector's registration record shall be transferred from the old county only if:

The elector provides a driver's license or identification card number, and the county clerk and recorder of the new county of residence can match the name, date of birth, and driver's license or identification card number to the elector's prior registration record; or

The elector provides a social security number, and the county clerk and recorder of the new county of residence can match the name, date of birth, and social security number to the elector's prior registration record.

If the elector does not provide a prior address, driver's license number, or social security number, the registration record shall not be transferred from the old county unless the elector submits additional information that complies with the requirements of this subsection (1). The county clerk and recorder of the county of prior residence may send notice to the elector by forwardable mail to the elector's address of record. Any such notice shall have a returnable portion that has the return postage prepaid and is preaddressed to the sending county clerk and recorder, and shall include an area for the elector to indicate if the elector has moved to another county and wishes to have his or her registration record transferred from the old county.

If a county clerk and recorder receives a notice from the secretary of state or from an election official in another state that the elector has registered to vote in another state, the county clerk and recorder of the county of prior residence shall cancel the registration record if the name and birth date or the name and social security number of the elector match.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 466, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1018), ch. 158, p. 683, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 832, § 7, effective May 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-303 (2) and (3) as it existed prior to 1997.

1-2-604. Cancellation of electors with multiple registrations.

Based upon an examination of the secretary of state's master lists of registered electors, each county clerk and recorder shall generate a list containing the name of each elector who is registered in more than one precinct in the state and shall cancel from the county's master lists of registered electors the name of the elector wherever it appears, except where it corresponds to the elector's most recent date of registration.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1018), ch. 158, p. 684, § 6, effective August 5, 2009.)

The county clerk and recorder may not cancel the registration record pursuant to subsection (1) of this section unless there is a match in the county's registration records and the statewide voter registration database with respect to, at a minimum, the following types of identifying information:

The elector's name, date of birth, and prior residence; or

The elector's name, date of birth, and driver's license number or social security number.

If the county clerk and recorder is not able to cancel the registration record pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the county clerk and recorder shall send a notice to the elector whose record the clerk and recorder intends to cancel. The notice shall be sent to that elector's address of record, shall have a returnable portion that has the return postage prepaid and that is preaddressed to the sending county clerk and recorder, and shall include an area for the elector to indicate if the elector has moved to another county and wishes to have his or her registration record transferred from the old county.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 466, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1018), ch. 158, p. 684, § 6, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-2-302 (5)(b) and 1-2-304 (1) as they existed prior to 1997.

1-2-605. Canceling registration - procedures.

Correspondence by mail from the county clerk and recorder to a registered elector of a county must include, at a minimum, the elector's name and address.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), if correspondence described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) is returned by the United States postal service as undeliverable, the county clerk and recorder shall mark the elector's registration record "Inactive" and mail the elector a confirmation card.

If correspondence described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) is returned by the United States postal service as undeliverable and the elector's registration record is already marked "Inactive", the county clerk and recorder shall not modify the record and may not mail the elector a confirmation card.

If an elector's confirmation card is not returned to the county clerk and recorder as undeliverable, the county clerk and recorder shall not change the elector's registration record.

Repealed.

Any registered elector whose registration record is marked "Inactive" is eligible to vote in any election where registration is required if the elector meets all other requirements.

A county clerk and recorder shall mark an "Inactive" elector's registration record as "Active" if:

The elector updates his or her registration information; or

The elector votes in an election conducted by a county clerk and recorder or an election for which the registration information has been provided to the clerk and recorder; or

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

The elector completes, signs, and returns a confirmation card or change of address card.

If an active elector's mail ballot is returned to the county clerk and recorder by the United States postal service as undeliverable, the county clerk and recorder shall mark the elector's registration record "Inactive" and send to the elector a confirmation card by which the elector may verify or correct the address information. If the elector verifies that he or she has moved within the state, the county clerk and recorder shall forward the address information to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the voter resides to update the elector's registration record with the new address. If the elector verifies that he or she has moved outside the state, the county clerk and recorder shall cancel the elector's registration record. If the elector fails to respond, the county clerk and recorder shall leave the registration record of that elector marked "Inactive".

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

If an elector whose registration record is marked "Inactive" fails to update his or her registration record, fails to respond to any confirmation card, and fails to vote in any election conducted by the county clerk and recorder during the time period that includes two consecutive general elections since the elector's registration record was marked "Inactive", the county clerk and recorder shall cancel the elector's registration record. Nothing in this section allows an elector's registration record to be canceled solely for failure to vote.

No later than ninety days following any general election, the county clerk and recorder shall furnish to the county chairperson of each major political party a list containing the names, addresses, precinct numbers, and party affiliations of the electors whose registration records were canceled pursuant to this section.

to (11) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 467, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(6)(a), (8), and (10) amended, p. 760, § 14, effective May 20; (1)(a), (5), (6)(b), and (7) amended, p. 279, § 4, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(10) amended, p. 1396, § 10, effective June 6; (10) amended, p. 1431, § 10, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(a), (4)(c), and (6)(b) amended, p. 1777, § 11, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1875, § 1, effective June 2; (2) amended and (11) added, pp. 1742, 1743, §§ 1, 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(5) amended, (HB 09-1216), ch. 165, p. 728, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(7) amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 832, § 8, effective May 5.

L. 2012:

(6)(b) and (8) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 678, § 7, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 700, § 26, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended and (2) repealed, (HB 16-1093), ch. 126, p. 360, § 5, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-224 as it existed prior to 1997.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-2-606. Cancellation by reason of criminal conviction in federal court.

If an elector whose residence is in the state of Colorado is convicted of a felony in a district court of the United States, the United States attorney shall give written notice of the conviction to the secretary of state of Colorado. The notice shall include the name of the offender, the offender's age and residence address, the date of entry of the judgment, a description of the offenses of which the offender was convicted, and the sentence imposed by the court. The United States attorney shall additionally give the secretary of state written notice of the vacation of the judgment if the conviction is overturned.

The secretary of state shall forward the information received pursuant to this section to the applicable county clerk and recorder of the county in which the offender resides.

The county clerk and recorder shall cancel the registration of the elector as of the date of receipt of the information from the secretary of state, and the registration shall remain canceled until the offender reregisters to vote.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 470, § 1, effective July 1.